Louisiana, session 2026, HB848.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 32:1252(1) and (9) and 1254(E)(5)(a) are hereby amended and
reenacted and R.S. 32:1254(E)(5)(c) and 1270.11(2)(k) are hereby enacted to read as
follows:
§1252. Definitions
The following words, terms, and phrases, when used in this Chapter, shall
have the meanings respectively ascribed to them in this Section, except where the
context clearly indicates a different meaning:
(1) "All-terrain vehicle" shall mean means any vehicle manufactured for off-
road use and issued a manufacturer's statement or certificate of origin, as required
by the commission, that cannot be issued a registration certificate and license to
operate on the public roads of this state because, at the time of manufacture, the
vehicle does not meet the safety requirements prescribed by R.S. 32:1301 through
1310. This includes vehicles that are issued a title by the Department of Public
Safety and Corrections, public safety services, such as golf carts and recreational and
sports vehicles, but it shall does not include off-road vehicles used for farm purposes,
farm equipment, electric-assisted bicycles, or heavy construction equipment.
* * *
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 848 ENROLLED
(9) "Dealer" means any person licensed to sell a motor vehicle, specialty
vehicle, or recreational product subject to regulation by this Chapter. "Dealer", for
purposes of all-terrain vehicles and golf carts, includes any person, business, or
entity that sells, offers for sale, or distributes such vehicles at retail, regardless of
whether that person or entity is primarily engaged in another line of business.
* * *
§1254. Application for license; requirements for licensure; contents; licenses;
franchise filings; exceptions
* * *
E. Additional licensing and compliance requirements for motor vehicle and
recreational products dealers.
* * *
(5)(a) The applicant must also furnish satisfactory evidence that the applicant
maintains adequate space in the building or structure wherein the applicant's
established business is conducted for the display of new motor vehicles or
recreational products, together with adequate facilities for the repair and servicing
of motor vehicles or recreational products and the storage of new parts and
accessories for the repair and servicing. For purposes of this Subparagraph,
"adequate facilities for the repair and servicing" means facilities sufficient to
reasonably support warranty service, maintenance, and repair obligations associated
with the recreational products sold by the dealer.
* * *
(c)(i) A dealer of all-terrain vehicles, including golf carts, shall have
adequate facilities for the repair and servicing of all-terrain vehicles and the storage
of new parts and accessories for that repair and servicing, which may be satisfied by
any of the following:
(aa) Adequate facilities for the repair and servicing of all-terrain vehicles and
the storage of new parts and accessories for that repair and servicing located in the
building or structure where the applicant's established business is conducted or
within one thousand feet of the established place of business.
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 848 ENROLLED
(bb) An agreement with a third-party warranty service provider that is
equipped and qualified to perform that repair and servicing, located within this state
and within a radius of forty miles of the dealer's established place of business. The
dealer shall make available to the purchaser applicable warranty information relating
to the vehicle.
(cc) An agreement with the manufacturer to provide an opportunity to the
consumer to obtain service from a warranty-authorized service provider. The dealer
shall make available to the purchaser applicable warranty information relating to the
vehicle.
(dd) A manufacturer-authorized service provider.
(ii) Prior to the execution of any sale or financing agreement for an
all-terrain vehicle, a dealer of all-terrain vehicles including golf carts shall provide
written disclosure to the purchaser if warranty repair and service for that vehicle are
to be performed primarily by a remote service facility pursuant to a contractual
arrangement with another entity. That purchaser shall acknowledge receipt of the
disclosure in writing prior to completion of the sale, and that dealer shall retain a
copy of that acknowledgment in its records for three years or until expiration of the
warranty, whichever is lesser. That disclosure shall include all of the following
information:
(aa) The name and physical address of the remote service and repair facility.
(bb) The approximate distance between the dealership and the remote service
and repair facility.
(cc) A statement advising the purchaser that certain warranty repair and
services may require transportation of the vehicle to the remote service facility.
(iii) A dealer shall not be liable for any subsequent change in the availability,
location, authorization, ownership, or operational status of a manufacturer-authorized
service provider or third-party warranty service provider identified in the disclosure
required by this Item (ii) of this Subparagraph, if that dealer acted in good faith and
supplied accurate information at the time of sale.
* * *
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 848 ENROLLED
§1270.11. Unauthorized acts
It shall be a violation of this Part:
* * *
(2) For a motorcycle or all-terrain vehicle dealer, used motorcycle or all-
terrain vehicle dealer, or a motorcycle or all-terrain vehicle salesman:
* * *
(k) For a dealer of all-terrain vehicles, including golf carts, to fail to maintain
repair facilities or otherwise comply with the requirements of R.S. 32:1254(E)(5)(c).
* * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.